Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-529.03
Flood control projects; removal to another site; definitions.

For purposes of sections 17-529.03 to 17-529.07:

(1) The term old city or village shall mean a city of the second class or village at its old location, and is not used in the sense that it is another or different city or village after its removal to a new site;

(2) The term new city or village shall mean a city of the second class or village at its new location, and is not used in the sense that it is another or different city or village than it was before its removal from an old site;

(3) The term county board shall mean the board of county commissioners or board of supervisors of a county; and

(4) The term governing board shall mean the city council of a city of the second class, or the village board of trustees.

Laws 1947, c. 44, § 1, p. 160;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 151.
August 24, 2017